en: Apple schorle
de: Apfelschorle, Apfelsaftschorle

en: Apricot nectars, apricot juices
bg: Нектар от кайсия, Сок от кайсия
de: Aprikosennektare, Aprikosensäfte, Aprikosensaft
es: Néctares de albaricoque, Zumos de albaricoque
fi: aprikoosinektarit
fr: Nectars d'abricot, nectar d'abricot, nectars d'abricots, nectar abricot, Jus d'abricot
hr: Nektari marelica
hu: Sárgabaracknektárok, Sárgabaracknektár
it: Nettare di albicocca, Succo di albicocca
lt: Abrikosų nektarai, Abrikosų nektaras, Abrikosų sultys
nl: Abrikozennectars, Abrikozennectar, Abrikozensappen, Abrikozensap
pt: Néctares de damasco

en: Papaya nectars
es: Néctares de papaya
fr: Nectars de papaye
hr: Nektari papaje
hu: Papaja nektárok
it: Nettare di papaya
nl: Papayanectars, Papayanectar
pt: Néctares de papaia

en: Banana nectars
bg: Нектар от банан, бананов нектар
de: Bananennektare
es: Néctares de plátano
fr: Nectars de banane, nectar de banane, nectar banane, nectars banane
he: נקטרי בננה, מיצי בננה
hr: Nektari od banane
hu: Banánnektárok
it: Nettare di banana
lt: Bananų nektarai, bananų nektaras
nl: Bananennectars, Bananennectar
pl: Nektary bananowe
pt: Néctares de banana
zh: 香蕉花蜜

en: Blueberry nectars
bg: Нектар от боровинки
de: Heidelbeernektare, Blaubeerennektare
es: Néctares de arándanos
fr: Nectars de myrtilles
hr: Nektari borovnice
hu: Áfonyanektárok
it: Nettare di mirtillo
lt: Mėlynių nektarai, Mėlynių nektaras
nl: Blauwe bessennectars, Blauwe bessennectar
pt: Néctares de mirtilo
zh: 蓝莓花蜜

en: Grape nectars
bg: Нектар от грозде
de: Weintraubennektare, Traubennektare
es: Néctares de uva
fr: Nectars de raisin, nectar de raisin, nectar de raisins, nectars de raisins, nectar raisin
hr: Nektari grožđa
hu: Szőlőnektárok
it: Nettare di uva
lt: Vynuogių nektarai, Vynuogių nektaras
nl: Druivennectars, Druivennectar
pt: Néctares de uva
zh: 葡萄花蜜

en: Grapefruit nectars
de: Grapefruit-Nektare
es: Néctares de pomelo
fr: Nectars de pamplemousse
hr: Nektari od grejpa
hu: Grépfrútnektárok
it: Nettare di pompelmo
lt: Greipfrutų nektarai, Greipfrutų nektaras
nl: Grapefruitnectars, Grapefruitnectar
pl: Nektary grejpfrutowe, Nektary z grejpfruta

en: Guava nectars
de: Guavennektare
es: Néctares de guayaba
fi: guavanektarit
fr: Nectars de goyave, nectar de goyave, nectar goyave
hr: Nektari guave
hu: Guavanektárok
it: Nettare di guaiava
lt: Gvajavų nektarai, gvajavų nektaras
nl: Guavanectars, Guavanectar
pl: Nektary z guawy
pt: Néctares de goiaba

en: Lychee nectars
fr: Nectars de litchi
hu: Licsinektárok
nl: Lycheenectars

en: Mango nectars
bg: Нектар от манго
de: Mangonektare
es: Néctares de mango
fi: mangonektarit
fr: Nectars de mangue, nectar de mangue, nectar mangue, nectars mangue
hr: Nektari manga
hu: Mangónektárok
it: Nettare di mango
lt: Mangų nektarai, Mangų nektaras
nl: Mangonectars, Mangonectar
pl: Nektary z mango
pt: Néctares de manga
zh: 芒果花蜜

en: Melon nectars
de: Melonennektare
es: Néctares de melón
fr: Nectars de melon
hr: Nektari dinje
hu: Dinnyenektárok
it: Nettare di melone
lt: Melionų nektarai, melionų nektaras
nl: Meloennectars, Meloennectar, Meloenennectar
pl: Nektary z melona
zh: 甜瓜花蜜

en: Multifruit nectars, Mixed fruits nectars
de: Mehrfrucht-Nektare
es: Néctares multifruta, Néctares multifrutas
fi: monihedelmänektarit
fr: Nectars multifruits
hr: Viševoćni nektari
hu: Vegyesgyümölcs-nektárok, Vegyes gyümölcsnektár Vegyes gyümölcs nektár
it: Nettari multifrutta
lt: Įvairių vaisių nektarai, Įvairių vaisių nektaras
nl: Multivruchtennectars, Multivruchtennectar
pl: Nektary wieloowocowe
ru: Мульти-фруктовые нектары
zh: 多果子花蜜, 多果蜜

en: Multivitamin mixed fruits nectars
fr: Nectars multifruits multivitaminés

en: Orange nectars
bg: Нектар от портокал, портокалов нектар
de: Orangennektare
es: Néctares de naranja
fi: appelsiininektarit
fr: Nectars d'orange
hr: Narančasti nektari
hu: Narancsnektárok
it: Nettare di arancia
lt: Apelsinų nektarai, apelsinų nektaras
nl: Sinaasappelnectars, Sinaasappelnectar
pl: Nektary pomarańczowe
pt: Néctares de laranja
zh: 橙花蜜, 橙子花蜜

en: Passion fruit nectars, Passionfruit nectars
de: Maracujanektare, Passionsfruchtnektare
es: Néctares de maracuyá, Néctares de fruta de la pasión
fi: Passiohedelmänektarit, Passionhedelmänektarit
fr: Nectars de fruit de la passion, nectar de fruit de la passion, nectar fruit de la passion, nectar passion, nectars passion, nectars de fruits de la passion
hr: Nektari marakuje
hu: Marakujanektárok
lt: Psiflorų nektarai, pasiflorų nektaras
nl: Passievruchtnectars, Passievruchtnectar
pl: Nektary z marakui, Nektary z passiflory
pt: Néctares de maracujá

en: Fresh passion fruit juices
fr: Jus de fruit de la passion frais

en: Peach nectars
bg: Нектар от праскова
de: Pfirsichnektare
es: Néctares de melocotón, Néctares de durazno
fi: persikkanektarit
fr: Nectars de pêche, nectar de pêche, nectar pêche
hr: Nektari breskve
hu: Őszibaracknektárok
it: Nettare di pesca
lt: Persikų nektarai, persikų nektaras
nl: Perzikennectars, Perzikennectar
pl: Nektary brzoskwiniowe
pt: Néctares de pêssego
zh: 桃花蜜, 桃子花蜜

en: Pear nectars
bg: Нектар от круши
de: Birnennektare
es: Néctares de pera
fi: päärynänektarit
fr: Nectars de poire
hr: Nektari od krušaka
hu: Körtenektárok
it: Nettare di pera
lt: Kriaušių nektarai, kriaušių nektaras
nl: Perennectars, Perennectar
pl: Nektary gruszkowe, Nektary z gruszki
pt: Néctares de pêra
zh: 梨花蜜, 梨子花蜜

en: Strawberry nectars
bg: Нектар от ягоди
fi: Mansikkanektarit
fr: Nectars de fraise
hr: Nektari od jagoda
hu: Epernektárok
it: Nettare di fragola
lt: Braškių nektarai, braškių nektaras
nl: Aardbeiennectar
pl: Nektary truskawkowe
pt: Néctares de morango

en: Raspberry nectars
bg: Нектар от малини
fr: Nectars de framboise
hr: Nektari maline
hu: Málnanektárok
it: Nettare di lamponi
lt: Aviečių nektarai, aviečių nektaras
pl: Nektary malinowe
pt: Néctares de framboesa